New York, session 2025-2026, A8220.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 11 of section 3.05 of the arts and cultural 2 affairs law, as added by chapter 677 of the laws of 2024, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 11. To promote regions of cultural significance by providing cultural 5 institutions within such regions grants, technical assistance, or other 6 assistance authorized by this section as the council deems appropriate, 7 including, but not limited to[,]: 8 (a) East Harlem, also known as "El Barrio"[. This], this region shall 9 be bounded by East 96th Street on the South, 5th Avenue on the West, 10 East 125th Street on the North and the East River on the East; and 11 (b) the Harlem Renaissance Cultural District, this region shall be 12 bounded by 110th Street on the South, the Hudson River on the West, 13 155th Street on the North and the 5th Avenue on the East. 14 The council may designate additional regions of cultural significance 15 at its discretion but such regions shall be compact, contiguous, and 16 have an identifiable cultural heritage which unites the region. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11503-03-5